pl: Odpowiednie dla typu łodzi: Kanadyjka; Łódź smoka; Łódź składana; Łódź nadmuchiwana; Kajak; Kanoe z wysięgnikiem; Tratwa; Łódź wiosłowa; Łódź na dwa wiosła; Deska do wiosłowania na stojąco; Tratwa do spływu górskiego; Inne
es: Adecuado para tipo de bote: Canoa; Barco dragón; Barco plegable; Barco inflable; Kayak; Canoa hawaiana; Balsa; Bote de remos; Piragua; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Balsa de aguas bravas; Otros
hu: Csónaktípus: Kenu; Sárkányhajó; Összecsukható csónak; Felfújható csónak; Kajak; Kivetős kenu; Tutaj; Evezős csónak; Sculling csónak; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Fehér vízi tutaj; Egyéb
vi: Phù hợp với loại thuyền: Xuồng; Thuyền rồng; Thuyền gấp; Thuyền phao; Chèo thuyền kayak; Ca nô Outrigger; Bè; Thuyền chèo; Thuyền chèo đơn; Ván chèo đứng (SUP); Bè đi thác nước; Khác
fi: Sopii venetyypille: Kanootti; Lohikäärmevene; Kokoontaitettava vene; Kumivene; Kajakki; Tukijalkavene; Lautta; Soutuvene; Kilpasoutuvene; Seisottava melontalauta (SUP); Valkoinen vesilautta; Muu
cs: Vhodné pro typ lodi: Kanoe; Dračí loď; Skládací člun; Nafukovací člun; Kajak; Výložníková kánoe; Raft; Veslice; Scullingový člun; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Raft na divokou vodu; Jiné
nb: Egnet for båttype: Kano; Dragebåt; Foldbåt; Oppblåsbar båt; Kajakk; Utriggerkano; Flåte; Robåt; Scullerbåt; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Hvitvannsflåte; Annet
th: เหมาะกับประเภทเรือ: Canoe; เรือมังกร; เรือพับ; เรือยาง; เรือคายัค; เรือแคนูกรรเชียง; แพ; เรือพาย; เรือกรรเชียง; บอร์ดยืนพาย (SUP); เรือล่องแก่ง; อื่นๆ
de: Geeignet für Bootstyp: Kanu; Drachenboot; Faltboot; Schlauchboot; Kajak; Auslegerkanu; Floß; Ruderboot; Ruderboot; Stand-Up-Paddleboard (SUP); Wildwasser-Rafting; Sonstiges
it: Adatto per tipo di barca: Canoe; Dragon Boat; Barca pieghevole; Gommone; Kayak; Canoa con stabilizzatore; Zattera; Rowboat; Barca da rema; Stand up paddle (SUP); Zattera d'acqua bianca; Altro
ko: 보트 유형에 적합: 카누; 드레곤 보트; 폴드 보트; 공기주입식 보트; 카약; 아웃리거 카누; 뗏목; 노젓는 배; 스컬링 보트; 스탠드업 패들보드(SUP); 급류 레프팅; 기타
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип лодка: Кану; Драконова лодка; Сгъваема лодка; Надуваема лодка; Каяк; Кану Outrigger; Сал; Гребна лодка; Лодка скул; Стендъп падълборд (SUP); Лодка за бързеи; Други
zh-TW: 適用船類型: 折疊口袋刀; 龍舟; 折疊船; 充氣船; 獨木舟; 支架獨木舟; 筏; 划艇; 雙槳船; 立式槳板 (SUP); 白水筏; 其他
zh-CN: 适用船型: 独木舟; 龙舟; 折叠船; 充气船; 皮划艇; 独桅帆船; 橡皮艇; 划艇; 双桨船; 站立式桨板; 激流划艇; 其他
ru: Для какого типа лодки: Каноэ; Лодка-дракон; Складная лодка; Надувная лодка; Каяк; Каноэ с выносными опорами; Плот; Весельная лодка; Лодка для гребли; Доска для серфинга с веслом (сапборд); Лодка для рафтинга; Другое
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο σκάφους: Canoe; Βάρκα με δράκο; Πτυσσόμενο σκάφος; Φουσκωτό σκάφος; Είδος ξύλινης βάρκας; Κανό Outrigger; Σχεδία; Βάρκα με κουπιά; Σκαφτικό σκάφος; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Λευκό νερό σχεδία; Άλλο
pt-BR: Adequado para o tipo de barco: Canoa; Barco dragão; Barco dobrável; Barco inflável; Caiaque; Canoa havaiana; Jangada; Barco a remo; Ginga; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Barco de rafting; Outro
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de barcă: Canoe; Barcă dragon; Barcă pliabilă; Barcă gonflabilă; Kayak; Canoe cu stabilizatoare; Plută; Barcă cu vâsle; Barcă cu rame; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Plută pentru ape învolburate; Altele
sv: Lämplig för båttyp: Kanot; Drakbåt; Vikbåt; Uppblåsbar båt; Kajak; Outrigger kanot; Flotte; Roddbåt; Sculling båt; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); White water flotte; Övrigt
ja: ボートタイプに適しています: カヌー; ドラゴンボート; フォールドボート; インフレータブルプール; カヤック; アウトリガーカヌー; ラフト; 手漕ぎボート; スカルボート; スタンドアップパドルボード (SUP); ホワイトウォーターラフティング; その他
nl: Type geschikt voor boot: Kano; Drakenboot; Vouwboot; Opblaasbaare boot; Kajak; Outrigger kano; Raft; Roeiboot; Sculboot; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Wildwaterraft; Andere
tr: Tekne tipine uygun: Kano; Ejderha botu; Katlanır bot; Şişme bot; Kayık; Payandalı kano; Sal; Sandal; Kürek teknesi; Ayakta kürek tahtası (SUP); Beyaz su salı; Diğer
en: Suitable for boat type: Canoe; Dragon boat; Foldboat; Inflatable boat; Kayak; Outrigger canoe; Raft; Rowboat; Sculling boat; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); White water raft; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta plovila za koje je prikladno: Kanu; Zmajev čamac; Sklopivi čamac; Čamac na napuhavanje; Kajak; Outrigger kanu; Splav; Čamac na vesla; Veslački čamac; Daska za veslanje u stojećem položaju (SUP); Čamac za rafting; Ostalo
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ člna: Kanoe; Dračia loď; Skladací čln; Nafukovací čln; Kajak; Kanoe outrigger; Plť; Veslica; Veslový čln; Paddleboard (SUP); Plť na divokej vode; Iné
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto čolna: Kanu; Zmajski čoln; Zložljiv čoln; Gumenjak; Kajak; Izvlečni kanu; Raft; Čoln na vesla; Dvojec; Deska za veslanje stoje (SUP); Splav za divje vode; Drugo
lt-LT: Tinka valčių tipui: Kanoja; Drakono valtis; Sulankstoma valtis; Pripučiama valtis; Kajakas; Atraminė kanoja; Plaustas; Irklinė valtis; Vienvietė valtis; Stovima irklentė (SUP); Upės plaustas; Kita
fr: Convient au type de bateau: Canoë; Dragon boat; Bateau pliable; Bateau gonflable; Kayak; Canoë à balancier; Radeau; Chaloupe; Bateau à godille; Planche à pagaie debout (SUP); Rafting en eau vive; Autre
da: Velegnet til bådtype: Kano; Dragebåd; Foldebåd; Oppustelig båd; Kajak; Udriggerkano; Tømmerflåde; Robåd; Sculler; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Hvidvandsflåde; Andet
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de barco: Canoa; Dragon boat; Barco dobrável; Piscina insuflável; Caiaque; Canoa estabilizadora; Jangada; Barco a remos; Barco com escuna; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Jangada de água branca; Outro